Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1102
Refunding instruments; how issued.

Whenever it is desired to issue pledge warrants, revenue bonds, or revenue debentures under section 18-1101, the city council or village board of trustees shall, by resolution recorded in the minutes of its proceedings, provide for the issuance and sale or exchange of the refunding instruments.

Laws 1937, c. 40, § 2, p. 179;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2202;

R.S.1943, § 18-1102;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 74.